District of Columbia statutes.
2-1201.05

Funding.

The Office shall be funded by a variety of sources currently available or potentially available in the future, including, but not limited to, federal loans and grant funds, community development block grant funds, District of Columbia government appropriated or borrowed funds, and private endowments. Sources of funding for the Office shall include no less than $300,000 in community development block grant funds conditionally approved by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for business and economic development programs, pursuant to the Department’s approval on June 24, 1975 of the District of Columbia “Application for Federal Assistance for a Community Development Block Grant Program— 1975.”

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-97, § 6, 23 DCR 9532b

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2205.
1973 Ed., § 1-1355.

Transfer of Functions

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 2-1201.02.

Editor's Notes

Office of Business and Economic Development abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 2-1201.02.